Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska76-229
Proof in lieu of acknowledgment; power of officer to subpoena witnesses.

The officer has power to issue the necessary subpoenas for the subscribing witnesses, residing in the same county, to appear before him for the purpose stated in section 76-228.

R.S.1866, c. 43, § 8, p. 281;

R.S.1913, § 6204;

C.S.1922, § 5603;

C.S.1929, § 76-209;

R.S.1943, § 76-229.